Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6319.13
Component or building component, defined.

Component or building component means a specific design or structural element or a fixture of a building, residential dwelling, or child-occupied facility that is distinguished from others by form, function, and location and may include, but is not limited to, (1) interior components such as ceilings, crown moldings, walls, chair rails, doors, door trim, floors, fireplaces, radiators and other heating units, shelves, shelf supports, stair treads, stair risers, stair stringers, newel posts, railing caps, balustrades, windows and trim including sashes, window heads, jambs, or sills or stools and troughs, built-in cabinets, columns, beams, bathroom vanities, counter tops, and air conditioners and (2) exterior components such as painted roofing, chimneys, flashing, gutters and downspouts, ceilings, soffits, fascia, rake boards, cornerboards, bulkheads, doors and door trim, fences, floors, joists, lattice work, railings and railing caps, siding, handrails, stair risers and treads, stair stringers, columns, balustrades, window sills or stools and troughs, casings, sashes, and wells, and air conditioners.

Laws 1999, LB 863, § 15.